Massachusetts, session 194th, H3624.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 28. No person shall cause, suffer, allow or permit a locomotive train engine to 
idle longer than 30 minutes. The department of environmental protection shall investigate all 
reported cases of train idling in excess of 30 minutes.  During its investigation, the department 
shall conduct emission tests to determine the level of carbon dioxide, nitrogen oxides, carbon 
monoxides, and sulfur dioxide being released from the train. 
Emission levels shall not exceed those of Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority 
trains as previously determined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.  If it is 
determined that these emission levels have been exceeded, the violator shall be fined no less than 
$5,000 for each violation.